North Dakota, session 69, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-03-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
20.1-03-12. Schedule of fees for licenses and permits.
The fees collected under this section for licenses and permits must be deposited with the state
treasurer and credited to the game and fish fund, except aquatic nuisance species fees must be
deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the aquatic nuisance species program fund. Forty-five
dollars of each nonresident big game hunting license fee must be used for the private land initiative.
The various license and permit fees are as follows:
1. For a resident, age sixteen and over, small game hunting license, ten dollars.
2. For a nonresident small game hunting license, one hundred dollars.
3. For a resident big game hunting license, thirty dollars, except the fee for a licensee under age
sixteen is ten dollars, except as provided in a gubernatorial proclamation issued pursuant to
section 20.1-08-04.1.
4. Except for a nonresident who participates on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer
licenses remaining after the second lottery for residents under subsection 4 of section
20.1-03-11, for a nonresident big game hunting license, two hundred fifty dollars, and for a
nonresident bow license, two hundred fifty dollars, and a nonrefundable five dollar application
fee must accompany any lottery license fee under this subsection, except as provided in a
gubernatorial proclamation issued pursuant to section 20.1-08-04.1. For a nonresident who
participates on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer licenses remaining after the
second lottery for residents, fifty dollars.
5. For a resident fur-bearer license, fifteen dollars.
6. For a resident fishing license, sixteen dollars, except that for a resident sixty-five years or over,
a resident totally or permanently disabled, or a resident disabled veteran who has at least a
fifty percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans' affairs
or has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran's
total disability ratio to at least fifty percent, the license fee is five dollars.
7. For a nonresident fishing license, forty-five dollars.
8. For a resident husband and wife fishing license, twenty-two dollars.
9. For a nonresident nongame hunting license, fifteen dollars.
10. For a resident wild turkey permit, fifteen dollars.
11. For an annual general game license, three dollars.

H. B. NO. 1147 - PAGE 2
12. For a license to a nonresident buyer or shipper of green furs, or that person's agent, the
amount that the nonresident buyer or shipper of green furs would pay for a nonresident buyer
or shipper of green furs license or comparable license in that person's state of residence, or
fifty dollars, whichever is greater.
13. For a license to a resident buyer or shipper of green furs, eight dollars for each place of
business maintained by that person within this state.
14. For a license to a resident traveling agent, buyer, or shipper of green furs, twenty dollars.
15. For an annual license to practice taxidermy, twenty-five dollars.
16. For a permit to ship, by a person having a resident hunting license, during the respective open
seasons, not to exceed in any one season twenty-five game birds, to points within this state
other than that person's home or to points outside this state, three dollars.
17. For a permit to make collections of protected birds and animals for scientific purposes, ten
dollars.
18. For a motorboat certificate of number and license: Each, each motorboat under:
a. Under sixteen feet [4.88 meters] in length, and all canoes, regardless of length, powered
by a motor, eighteen dollars. Each motorboat sixteen
b. Sixteen feet [4.88 meters] in length and over but shorter than twenty feet [6.1 meters] in
length, excluding canoes, thirty-six dollars. Each motorboat twenty
c. Twenty feet [6.1 meters] in length or over excluding canoes, forty-five dollars.
19. For the taking of undesirable fish from the waters of this state pursuant to section 20.1-06-05,
fifteen dollars for each hoop-net or trap, and fifteen dollars for each seine of fifty feet
[15.24 meters] or any fraction thereof.
20. For a resident paddlefish tag annual license, ten dollars per tag.
21. For a nonresident paddlefish tag annual license, twenty-five dollars and fifty cents per tag.
22. For an annual resident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, fifty dollars.
23. For an annual license to sell minnows or other live bait at retail, fifteen dollars, except the fee
is seventy-five dollars if white suckers are sold.
24. For an annual license to operate a private fish hatchery, seventy-five dollars.
25. For a resident commercial frog license, fifty dollars.
26. For a nonresident commercial frog license, two hundred dollars.
27. For a resident frog license, three dollars.
28. For a resident husband and wife frog license, five dollars.
29. For a shooting preserve operating permit, one hundred dollars, plus thirty cents per acre
[.40 hectare] for each acre [.40 hectare].
30. For a nonresident waterfowl hunting license, one hundred dollars.
31. For a nonresident husband and wife fishing license, sixty dollars.
32. For a nonresident short-term three-day fishing license, twenty-five dollars.

H. B. NO. 1147 - PAGE 3
33. For a nonresident fur-bearer and nongame hunting license, forty dollars.
34. For a combination license, fifty dollars.
35. For a white-tailed deer license sold to certified guides or outfitters and provided by them to
nonresidents, two hundred fifty dollars.
36. For a resident swan license, ten dollars.
37. For a nonresident swan license, thirty dollars.
38. For a resident sandhill crane license, ten dollars.
39. For a nonresident sandhill crane license, thirty dollars.
40. For a resident commercial clam license, one hundred dollars.
41. For a nonresident commercial clam license, one thousand dollars.
42. For a commercial clam dealer's permit, two thousand dollars. In addition, the applicant shall
submit to the director a surety bond in the sum of two thousand dollars.
43. For an annual class B nonresident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, two
hundred fifty dollars.
44. For a bighorn sheep license issued to a nonresident, five hundred dollars.
45. For a nonresident reciprocal trapping license, three hundred fifty dollars.
46. For a nonresident spring white goose license, fifty dollars.
47. For a resident certificate fee, one dollar, and for a nonresident certificate fee, two dollars. An
agent may not charge a service fee for issuing a resident or nonresident certificate fee.
48. For a nonresident short-term ten-day fishing license, thirty-five dollars.
49. For a nonresident wild turkey permit, eighty dollars.
50. For a statewide nonresident waterfowl hunting license, one hundred fifty dollars.
51. For an annual class A nonresident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, five
hundred dollars.
52. For a resident early Canada goose season license, five dollars.
53. For a nonresident early Canada goose season license, fifty dollars.
54. For a resident disabled veteran combined general game, habitat stamp, small game, and
fur-bearer license, for a resident disabled veteran who has at least a fifty percent service-
connected disability as determined by the department of veterans' affairs, three dollars.
55. For each motorboat licensed in this state, an aquatic nuisance species fee of fifteen dollars
valid concurrent with motorboat licensure.
56. For each motorboat operated on waters of this state and not licensed in this state, an aquatic
nuisance species fee of fifteen dollars for the calendar year in which it is paid.

H. B. NO. 1147 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1147.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State